Tables/Contraction/zh_TW.ctb
always \u661f\u76f8 15-13456-3-15-46-5
always \u6625\u5047 12-123456-3-13-23456-5
always \u662d\u8457 1-146-3-1-34-5
always \u6641\u932f 12-146-2-245-25-5
always \u6643\u8166 1235-456-5-1345-146-4
always \u6643\u8569 1235-456-5-145-1346-5
always \u6687\u7d66 15-23456-2-13-16-4
always \u6691\u5047 24-34-4-13-23456-5
always \u6696\u548c 1345-12456-4-1235-25-1
always \u66b4\u9732 1234-34-5-14-34-5
always \u66f2\u5b50 245-1256-4-125-156-1
always \u66f2\u5c3a 245-1256-3-12-156-4
always \u66f2\u5ea6 245-1256-3-145-34-5
always \u66f2\u6298 245-1256-3-1-2346-2
always \u66f2\u66f2 245-1256-3-245-1256-3
always \u66f2\u6c83 245-1256-3-25-5
always \u66f2\u76f4 245-1256-3-1-156-2
always \u66f2\u7dda 245-1256-3-15-2345-5
always \u66f2\u89e3 245-1256-3-13-346-4
always \u66f2\u961c 245-1256-3-12345-34-5
always \u66f4\u4e8b 13-1356-3-24-156-5
always \u66f4\u52d5 13-1356-3-145-12346-5
always \u66f4\u540d 13-1356-3-134-13456-2
always \u66f4\u5f35 13-1356-3-1-1346-3
always \u66f4\u5f97 13-1356-5-145-356-4
always \u66f4\u63db 13-1356-3-1235-12456-5
always \u66f4\u6539 13-1356-3-13-2456-4
always \u66f4\u65b0 13-1356-3-15-1456-3
always \u66f4\u6613 13-1356-3-16-5
always \u66f4\u66ff 13-1356-3-124-16-5
always \u66f4\u6b63 13-1356-3-1-1356-5
always \u66f4\u751f 13-1356-3-24-1356-3
always \u66f4\u865f 13-1356-3-1235-146-5
always \u66f4\u8863 13-1356-3-16-3
always \u66f4\u8fed 13-1356-3-145-346-2
always \u66f8\u5377 24-34-3-13-45-5
always \u66f9\u53c3 245-146-2-24-136-3
always \u66fe\u53c3 125-1356-3-24-136-3
always \u66fe\u5b50 125-1356-3-125-156-4
always \u66fe\u5b6b 125-1356-3-15-123456-3
always \u66fe\u6c0f 125-1356-3-24-156-5
always \u66fe\u7956 125-1356-3-125-34-4
always \u66fe\u978f 125-1356-3-13-12346-4
always \u6703\u5152 1235-1246-4-156-3
always \u6703\u7a3d 13-1246-5-13-16-3
always \u6703\u8a08 123-2356-5-13-16-5
always \u6703\u9577 1235-1246-5-1-1346-4
always \u6708\u5b50 236-5-125-156-1
always \u6708\u6688 236-5-256-5
always \u6708\u7d2f 236-5-14-356-4
always \u6709\u5206 234-4-12345-136-5
always \u6709\u671d 234-4-1-146-3
always \u670d\u5e16 12345-34-2-124-346-3
always \u671d\u4e09 1-146-3-15-1236-3
always \u671d\u4e0d 1-146-3-135-34-5
always \u671d\u4ee4 1-146-3-14-13456-5
always \u671d\u5915 1-146-3-15-16-5
always \u671d\u66e6 1-146-3-15-16-3
always \u671d\u6703 1-146-3-1235-1246-5
always \u671d\u671d 1-146-3-1-146-3
always \u671d\u6c23 1-146-3-245-16-5
always \u671d\u767c 1-146-3-12345-345-3
always \u671d\u79e6 1-146-3-245-1456-2
always \u671d\u967d 1-146-3-46-2
always \u671d\u9732 1-146-3-14-34-5
always \u671f\u5e74 13-16-3-1345-2345-2
always \u671f\u6708 13-16-3-236-5
always \u671f\u670d 13-16-3-12345-34-2
always \u6728\u585e 134-34-5-15-2456-3
always \u672a\u4e86 1246-5-14-246-4
always \u672b\u4e86 134-126-5-14-246-4
always \u672c\u5206 135-136-4-12345-136-5
always \u672c\u5b50 135-136-4-125-156-1
always \u672c\u884c 135-136-4-1235-1346-2
always \u674e\u5b50 14-16-4-125-156-1
always \u6751\u5b50 245-123456-3-125-156-1
always \u6751\u9577 245-123456-3-1-1346-4
always \u676f\u5b50 135-356-3-125-156-1
always \u677e\u6fe4 15-12346-3-124-146-3
always \u679c\u5b50 13-25-4-125-156-1
always \u67af\u840e 123-34-3-1246-3
always \u67b6\u5b50 13-23456-5-125-156-1
always \u67da\u5b50 234-5-125-156-1
always \u67e5\u52d8 12-345-2-123-1236-5
always \u67f1\u5b50 1-34-5-125-156-1
always \u67fa\u5b50 13-2356-4-125-156-1
always \u67ff\u5b50 24-156-5-125-156-1
always \u6813\u585e 24-12456-3-15-2456-3
always \u6813\u5b50 24-12456-3-125-156-1
always \u6821\u52d8 13-246-5-123-1236-3
always \u6821\u5c0d 13-246-5-145-1246-5
always \u6821\u6b63 13-246-5-1-1356-5
always \u6821\u6e96 13-246-5-1-123456-4
always \u6821\u8a02 13-246-5-145-13456-5
always \u6821\u9577 15-246-5-1-1346-4
always \u6821\u95b1 13-246-5-236-5
always \u683c\u5b50 13-2346-2-125-156-1
always \u683d\u7a2e 125-2456-3-1-12346-5
always \u6843\u5b50 124-146-2-125-156-1
always \u6846\u5b50 123-456-3-125-156-1
always \u6848\u5377 1236-5-13-45-5
always \u6848\u5b50 1236-5-125-156-1
always \u684c\u5b50 1-25-3-125-156-1
always \u6876\u5b50 124-12346-4-125-156-1
always \u687f\u5b50 13-1236-4-125-156-1
always \u6885\u5b50 134-356-2-125-156-1
always \u6886\u5b50 135-1346-3-125-156-1
always \u6897\u585e 13-1356-4-15-2346-5
always \u689d\u5b50 124-246-2-125-156-1
always \u68af\u5b50 124-16-3-125-156-1
always \u68b3\u5b50 24-34-3-125-156-1
always \u68cd\u5b50 13-123456-5-125-156-1
always \u68d2\u559d 135-1346-5-1235-2346-5
always \u68d2\u5b50 135-1346-5-125-156-1
always \u68da\u5b50 1234-1356-2-125-156-1
always \u6905\u5b50 16-4-125-156-1
always \u6930\u5b50 346-2-125-156-1
always \u6954\u5b50 15-346-5-125-156-1
always \u69d3\u5b50 13-1346-5-125-156-1
always \u6a02\u5287 236-5-13-1256-5
always \u6a02\u5668 236-5-245-16-5
always \u6a02\u5718 236-5-124-12456-2
always \u6a02\u58c7 236-5-124-1236-2
always \u6a02\u5b98 236-5-13-12456-3
always \u6a02\u5e2b 236-5-24-156-3
always \u6a02\u5e9c 236-5-12345-34-4
always \u6a02\u624b 236-5-24-12356-4
always \u6a02\u66f2 236-5-245-1256-4
always \u6a02\u6bb5 236-5-145-12456-5
always \u6a02\u6c34 246-5-24-1246-4
always \u6a02\u6d3e 236-5-1234-2456-5
always \u6a02\u7406 236-5-14-16-4
always \u6a02\u7ae0 236-5-1-1346-3
always \u6a02\u7c4d 236-5-13-16-2
always \u6a02\u8b5c 236-5-1234-34-4
always \u6a02\u8ff7 236-5-134-16-2
always \u6a02\u968a 236-5-145-1246-5
always \u6a02\u97f3 236-5-1456-3
always \u6a02\u98a8 236-5-12345-1356-3
always \u6a13\u5b50 14-12356-2-125-156-1
always \u6a21\u5b50 134-126-2-125-156-1
always \u6a21\u6a23 134-34-2-46-5
always \u6a23\u5b50 46-5-125-156-1
always \u6a58\u5b50 13-1256-2-125-156-1
always \u6a6b\u66b4 1235-1356-5-135-146-5
always \u6a6b\u6b7b 1235-1356-5-15-156-4
always \u6a6b\u798d 1235-1356-5-1235-25-5
always \u6a6b\u8089 1235-1356-5-1245-12356-5
always \u6a6b\u884c 1235-1356-5-15-13456-2
always \u6a6b\u8ca1 1235-1356-5-245-2456-2
always \u6ac3\u5b50 13-1246-5-125-156-1
always \u6adb\u6bd4 13-346-2-135-16-5
always \u6b21\u9577 245-156-5-1-1346-4
always \u6b23\u7fa1 15-1456-3-15-2345-5
always \u6b38\u4e43 2456-4-1345-2456-4
always \u6b3d\u5dee 245-1456-3-12-2456-3
always \u6b3e\u5b50 123-12456-4-125-156-1
always \u6b65\u5b50 135-34-5-125-156-1
always \u6b66\u5c07 34-4-13-46-5
always \u6b6a\u66f2 2356-3-245-1256-3
always \u6b78\u9084 13-1246-3-1235-12456-2
always \u6b78\u964d 13-1246-3-15-46-2
always \u6b7b\u7576 15-156-4-145-1346-5
always \u6b7b\u96e3 15-156-4-1345-1236-5
always \u6b89\u96e3 15-256-5-1345-1236-5
always \u6b9e\u6c92 256-4-134-126-5
always \u6bba\u4f10 24-345-3-12345-345-3
always \u6bbc\u5b50 123-2346-2-125-156-1
always \u6bcf\u884c 134-356-4-1235-1346-2
always \u6bd4\u53ca 135-16-5-13-16-2
always \u6bd4\u6bd4 135-16-5-135-16-5
always \u6bd4\u80a9 135-16-5-13-2345-3
always \u6bd4\u9130 135-16-5-14-1456-2
always \u6bef\u5b50 124-1236-4-125-156-1
always \u6bfd\u5b50 13-2345-5-125-156-1
always \u6c08\u5b50 1-1236-3-125-156-1
always \u6c34\u5206 24-1246-4-12345-136-5
always \u6c57\u4f4d 1235-1236-2-1246-5
always \u6c57\u570b 1235-1236-2-13-25-2
always \u6c57\u738b 1235-1236-2-456-2
always \u6c5f\u90fd 13-46-3-145-34-3
always \u6c60\u5b50 12-156-2-125-156-1
always \u6c88\u62ec 24-136-4-13-35-3
always \u6c88\u6c92 12-136-2-134-126-5
always \u6c88\u8457 12-136-2-1-25-2
always \u6c8f\u8336 245-16-5-12-345-2
always \u6c92\u4e16 134-126-5-24-156-5
always \u6c92\u5165 134-126-5-1245-34-5
always \u6c92\u6536 134-126-5-24-12356-3
always \u6c92\u6c92 134-126-5-134-126-5
always \u6c92\u843d 134-126-5-14-25-5
always \u6c92\u85e5 134-126-5-246-5
always \u6c92\u9802 134-126-5-145-13456-4
always \u6c92\u98f2 134-126-5-1456-4
always \u6c92\u9f52 134-126-5-12-156-4
always \u6c99\u5b50 24-345-3-125-156-1
always \u6cd5\u570b 12345-345-5-13-25-2
always \u6cd5\u5b50 12345-345-2-125-156-1
always \u6cd5\u76f8 12345-345-4-15-46-5
always \u6cd5\u862d 12345-345-5-14-1236-2
always \u6cd5\u8a9e 12345-345-5-1256-4
always \u6cef\u6c92 134-1456-4-134-126-5
always \u6d0b\u76f8 46-2-15-46-5
always \u6d0b\u884c 46-2-1235-1346-2
always \u6d3b\u585e 1235-25-2-15-2456-3
always \u6d77\u53c3 1235-2456-4-24-136-3
always \u6d77\u96e3 1235-2456-4-1345-1236-5
always \u6d88\u9577 15-246-3-1-1346-4
always \u6dd6\u7d04 12-25-5-236-3
always \u6de4\u585e 1256-3-15-2346-5
always \u6df1\u60e1 24-136-3-34-5
always \u6df1\u66f4 24-136-3-13-13456-3
always \u6df1\u7701 24-136-3-15-13456-4
always \u6df7\u4e82 1235-123456-4-14-12456-5
always \u6df7\u6c34 1235-123456-2-24-1246-4
always \u6df7\u6dc6 1235-123456-4-246-2
always \u6df7\u6fc1 1235-123456-2-1-25-2
always \u6df9\u6c92 2345-3-134-126-5
always \u6e21\u5047 145-34-5-13-23456-5
always \u6e23\u5b50 1-345-3-125-156-1
always \u6e2c\u5ea6 245-2346-5-145-25-5
always \u6e2c\u91cf 245-2346-5-14-46-2
always \u6e38\u8aaa 234-2-24-1246-5
always \u6e6e\u6c92 2345-3-134-126-5
always \u6e6e\u6ec5 1456-3-134-346-5
always \u6e6f\u6e6f 24-1346-3-24-1346-3
always \u6ecb\u9577 125-156-3-1-1346-4
always \u6ed1\u7a3d 13-34-4-13-16-3
always \u6ef4\u7b54 145-16-3-145-345-3
always \u6f02\u4eae 1234-246-5-14-46-5
always \u6f02\u767d 1234-246-4-135-2456-2
always \u6f0f\u5b50 14-12356-5-125-156-1
always \u6f15\u904b 245-146-2-256-5
always \u6f2b\u5929 134-1236-2-124-2345-3
always \u6f8e\u6e43 1234-1356-3-1234-2456-5
always \u6fc0\u5c07 13-16-3-13-46-5
always \u6fdf\u5357 13-16-4-1345-1236-2
always \u707d\u96e3 125-2456-3-1345-1236-5
always \u70ae\u88fd 1234-146-2-1-156-5
always \u70b8\u91ac 1-345-2-13-46-5
always \u70ba\u4e86 1246-5-14-2346-1
always \u70ba\u4ec0 1246-5-24-2346-2
always \u70ba\u4ed6 1246-5-124-345-3
always \u70ba\u4f55 1246-5-1235-2346-2
always \u70ba\u4f60 1246-5-1345-16-4
always \u70ba\u570b 1246-5-13-25-2
always \u70ba\u5979 1246-5-124-345-3
always \u70ba\u59b3 1246-5-1345-16-4
always \u70ba\u60a8 1246-5-1345-1456-2
always \u70ba\u6c11 1246-5-134-1456-2
always \u70ba\u864e 1246-5-1235-34-4
always \u70d9\u5370 14-146-5-1456-5
always \u70d9\u9435 14-146-5-124-346-4
always \u70d9\u9905 14-146-5-135-13456-4
always \u70f9\u8abf 1234-1356-3-124-246-2
always \u710a\u63a5 1235-1236-5-13-346-3
always \u710a\u689d 1235-1236-5-124-246-2
always \u7121\u7684 34-2-145-16-5
always \u7121\u7e2b 34-2-12345-1356-5
always \u7126\u6fdf 13-246-3-1-156-4
always \u715e\u4f4f 24-345-3-1-34-5
always \u715e\u8eca 24-345-3-12-2346-3
always \u7167\u61c9 1-146-5-13456-5
always \u7167\u76f8 1-146-5-15-46-5
always \u71ce\u539f 14-246-5-45-2
always \u71d5\u4eac 2345-3-13-13456-3
always \u71d5\u5b50 2345-5-125-156-1
always \u71df\u9577 13456-2-1-1346-4
always \u7210\u5b50 14-34-2-125-156-1
always \u722a\u5b50 1-35-4-125-156-1
always \u722a\u7259 1-146-4-23456-2
always \u7247\u5b50 1234-2345-5-125-156-1
always \u724c\u5b50 1234-2456-2-125-156-1
always \u725b\u4ed4 1345-234-2-125-2456-4
always \u7292\u52de 123-146-5-14-146-5
always \u729b\u725b 134-146-2-1345-234-2
always \u72af\u96e3 12345-1236-5-1345-1236-5
always \u72c0\u5b50 1-456-5-125-156-1
always \u72d7\u4ed4 13-12356-4-125-2456-4
always \u72e9\u7375 24-12356-5-14-346-5
always \u72fc\u85c9 14-1346-2-13-16-2
always \u72fc\u865f 14-1346-2-1235-146-2
always \u731b\u5c07 134-1356-4-13-46-5
always \u731c\u5ea6 245-2456-3-145-25-5
always \u7334\u5b50 1235-12356-2-125-156-1
always \u7343\u5b50 145-2456-3-125-156-1
always \u7345\u5b50 24-156-3-125-156-1
always \u7368\u8655 145-34-2-12-34-4
always \u7387\u5148 24-2356-5-15-2345-3
always \u7387\u5175 24-2356-5-135-13456-3
always \u7387\u540c 24-2356-5-124-12346-2
always \u7387\u5718 24-2356-5-124-12456-2
always \u7387\u5e2b 24-2356-5-24-156-3
always \u7387\u6027 24-2356-5-15-13456-5
always \u7387\u610f 24-2356-5-16-5
always \u7387\u7136 24-2356-5-1245-1236-2
always \u7387\u76f4 24-2356-5-1-156-2
always \u7387\u771f 24-2356-5-1-136-3
always \u7387\u773e 24-2356-5-1-12346-5
always \u7387\u8ecd 24-2356-5-13-256-3
always \u7387\u9818 24-2356-5-14-13456-4
always \u738b\u51a0 456-2-13-12456-3
always \u738b\u90fd 456-2-145-34-3
always \u73a9\u5473 12456-5-1246-5
always \u73a9\u5ffd 12456-5-1235-34-3
always \u73e0\u5b50 1-34-3-125-156-1
always \u73ed\u5b50 135-1236-3-125-156-1
always \u73ed\u9577 135-1236-3-1-1346-4
